Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-1124
Violation; penalty; actions authorized.

(1) A person who violates the Data Privacy Act following the cure period described by section 87-1122 or who breaches a written statement provided to the Attorney General under such section is liable for a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars for each violation.

(2) The Attorney General may bring an action in the name of the State of Nebraska to:

(a) Recover a civil penalty under this section;

(b) Restrain or enjoin the person from violating the Data Privacy Act; or

(c) Recover the civil penalty and seek injunctive relief.

(3) The Attorney General may recover reasonable attorney's fees and other reasonable expenses incurred in investigating and bringing an action under this section.

(4) All money collected under this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 24.
January 1, 2025